Utah statutes.
11-2-7.   Expenses -- Payment of -- Authority to appropriate and tax -- Licensing of television owners and users -- Collection of license fees.

All expenses incurred in the equipment, operation and maintenance of such recreational facilities and activities shall be paid from the treasuries of the respective cities, towns, counties, or school districts, and the governing bodies of the same may annually appropriate, and cause to be raised by taxation, money for such purposes. In areas so remote from regular transmission points of the large television stations that television reception is impossible without special equipment and adequate, economical and proper television is not available to the public by private sources, said local authorities may also, by ordinance, license, for the purpose of raising revenue to equip, operate and maintain television transmission and relay facilities, all users or owners of television sets within the jurisdiction of said local authorities, and may provide for the collection of the license fees by suit or otherwise and may also enforce obedience to such ordinances with such fine and imprisonment as the local authorities deem proper; provided that the punishment for any violation of such ordinances shall be by a fine not exceeding $50.00 or by imprisonment not exceeding one day for each $5.00 of said fine, if the fine is not paid.

